Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-217
Constitutional convention; candidates; petition; statements as to candidates.

In addition to containing the name of the candidate, the petition shall state as to each candidate:

(1) That he is a candidate for members of the constitutional convention for the legislative district in which the signatures are obtained;

(2) His place of residence with street and number thereof, if any; and

(3) A declaration by the candidate that he will qualify if elected.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 6, p. 549.